Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
PART 3
FOOD STAMPS

Cross references:

For the federal "Food Stamp Act", now known as the "Food and Nutrition Act of 2008", see 7 U.S.C. sec. 2011 et seq. (Section 4001 of the "Food, Conservation, and Energy Act of 2008", Pub.L. 110-234, changed the name of the federal "Food Stamp Act of 1977" to the "Food and Nutrition Act of 2008" and changed the name of the federal food stamp program to the "supplemental nutrition assistance program".)

26-2-301. Food stamps - administration.

The state department is hereby designated as the single state agency to administer or supervise the administration of the food stamp program in this state in cooperation with the federal government pursuant to the federal "Food Stamp Act", as amended, and this part 3.

The state department, with the approval of the state board, may enter into an agreement with the secretary of the United States department of agriculture to accept federal food assistance benefits for disbursement to qualified households in accordance with federal law. Under state department supervision, the responsibility for disbursement may be delegated, under agreement, to county departments, United States postal service facilities, or other commercial facilities such as but not limited to banks.

The food stamp program shall be implemented and administered in every county in the state by the respective county departments or by the state department pursuant to an agreement with one or more counties. If a county can demonstrate to the satisfaction of the state department that it is impossible or impractical for the county department to administer the program, the state department shall ensure that the program is implemented and administered within such county, and the county shall continue to meet the requirements of section 26-1-122.

The state department shall develop a state outreach plan, referred to in this section as the "outreach plan", to promote access by eligible persons to benefits through the supplemental nutrition assistance program. The outreach plan shall meet the criteria established by the food and nutrition services agency of the United States department of agriculture for approval of state outreach plans. The state department is authorized to seek and accept gifts, grants, and donations to develop and implement the outreach plan.

For purposes of developing and implementing an outreach plan, the state department shall partner with one or more counties and nonprofit organizations for the development and implementation of the outreach plan. If the state department enters into a contract with a nonprofit organization relating to the outreach plan, the contract may specify that the nonprofit organization is responsible for seeking sufficient gifts, grants, or donations necessary for the development and implementation of the outreach plan, and may additionally specify that any costs to the state associated with the award and management of the contract or the implementation or administration of the outreach plan shall be paid out of any private or federal moneys raised for the development and implementation of the outreach plan. The state department shall submit the outreach plan to the food and nutrition services agency for approval by September 1, 2010, and shall request any federal matching moneys that may be available upon approval of the outreach plan. The general assembly strongly encourages the state department to use any additional public or private moneys, including moneys from the federal 2010 department of defense appropriations bill to offset costs associated with increased caseload resulting from the implementation of an outreach plan.

Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection (4), the state department shall be exempt from implementing or administering an outreach plan, but not from developing an outreach plan, if the state department will not be receiving private or federal moneys sufficient to cover the state's costs associated with the implementation and administration of the outreach plan, including any state or county costs associated with increased caseload resulting from the implementation of the outreach plan.

The provisions of article 1 of this title and, where not inconsistent with this part 3, the provisions of part 1 of this article shall apply to federal food assistance benefits under this part 3.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire part added, p. 1086, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1022), ch. 414, p. 2042, § 1, effective June 10.

26-2-301.5. Performance standards - incentives - sanctions.

In implementing the supplemental nutrition assistance program, the state department and county departments shall endeavor to exceed federal performance measures in the following areas:

Application processing timeliness;

Payment error rate; and

Case and procedural error rate.

If the state department receives federal performance bonus money as a result of meeting the federal performance measures set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), the state department shall pass the federal performance bonus money through to the county departments; except that a county department shall only receive that portion of federal performance bonus money attributable to the county department's performance.

In addition to federal performance bonus money, subject to available appropriations for purposes of this paragraph (c), the state may award state-funded administration performance bonuses to county departments.

The state department, county departments, and any additional parties identified by the state department and county departments, shall mutually agree upon a method and formula for distributing to county departments any federal performance bonus money pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (1) and any state-funded administration performance bonuses pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subsection (1). Performance bonuses may be used by county departments for the administration of the supplemental nutrition assistance program upon receipt of federal approval of the county departments' plans.

The state department shall pass through to the county departments any monetary sanctions imposed by the federal government for failing to meet federal performance measures in any of the following areas:

Application processing timeliness;

Payment error rate; and

Unresolved compliance issues over which the county department has control, as mutually determined by the state department and county departments based upon analysis of validated data, specific to a county department's responsibilities in administering the supplemental nutrition assistance program, including claim discrepancies.

The state department, county departments, and any additional parties identified by the state department and county departments, shall mutually agree upon a method and formula for charging to county departments any federal monetary sanction for failing to meet performance measures pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (2); except that a county department shall only be responsible for the portion of a federal monetary sanction attributable to the county department's performance relating to activities within the county department's control, as mutually determined by the state department and county departments based upon analysis of validated data.

Source:

L. 2016:

Entire section added, (SB 16-190), ch. 201, p. 709, § 1, effective June 1.

26-2-302. Federal requirements.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to prevent the state department from complying with federal requirements for the food stamp program expressly provided by federal statute and regulation in order for the state of Colorado to qualify for federal funds under the federal "Food Stamp Act", as amended, and to maintain the food stamp program within the limits of available appropriations.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire part added, p. 1087, § 13, effective July 1.

26-2-303. Evidentiary conference. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 79:

Entire part added, p. 1087, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 1321, § 5, effective July 1.

26-2-304. Appeals - recoveries - rules.

The provisions of section 26-2-127, relating to appeals, and section 26-2-128, relating to recoveries, apply to the food stamp program, except when such sections conflict with federal statute or regulation or when a specific conflict with federal statute or regulation is not clearly present and the state department elects by regulation to follow federal statute or regulation.

Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, section 26-2-127 (1)(a)(I), and section 24-4-105 (14)(a)(I), for purposes of the food stamp program, the state department may promulgate rules requiring any party to file a notice of intent to file exceptions with the state department, in writing, within five days after service of the initial decision upon the party, or otherwise forgo the ability to file exceptions.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire part added, p. 1087, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (SB 19-245), ch. 308, p. 2800, § 1, effective May 28.

26-2-305. Fraudulent acts - penalties.

Any person who obtains, or any person who aids or abets another to obtain, food stamp coupons or authorization to purchase cards or an electronic benefits transfer card or similar credit card-type device through which food stamp benefits may be delivered to which the person is not entitled, or food stamp coupons or authorization to purchase cards or an electronic benefits transfer card or similar credit card-type device through which food stamp benefits may be delivered the value of which is greater than that to which the person is justly entitled by means of a willfully false statement or representation, or by impersonation, or by any other fraudulent device with intent to defeat the purposes of the food stamp program commits the crime of theft, which crime shall be classified in accordance with section 18-4-401 (2), C.R.S., and which crime shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401, C.R.S., if the crime is classified as a felony, or section 18-1.3-501, C.R.S., if the crime is classified as a misdemeanor. Any person violating the provisions of this subsection (1) is disqualified from participation in the food stamp program for one year for a first offense, two years for a second offense, and permanently for a third or subsequent offense. Any person convicted of trafficking in food stamp coupons as described in this subsection (1) having a value of five hundred dollars or more shall be permanently disqualified from the food stamp program.

Any person found by the agency or convicted in a court of law of having made a fraudulent statement or representation with respect to the identity or place of residence of the person in order to receive multiple benefits simultaneously under the food stamp program shall be disqualified from participating for a ten-year period.

Any person found guilty by a court of law of purchasing controlled substances, as defined in section 18-18-102 (5), C.R.S., with food stamp benefits shall be disqualified from participation in the food stamp program for two years for a first offense and permanently disqualified for the second offense. The disqualification periods shall apply also to individuals with a felony conviction entered on or after July 1, 1997, for possession, use, or distribution of controlled substances if the conviction is directly related to the misuse of food stamp benefits. An individual shall not be ineligible due to a drug conviction unless misuse of food stamp benefits is part of the court findings.

Any person who is found guilty by a court of law of trading ammunition or explosives for food stamp benefits is disqualified permanently from participating in the food stamp program.

A state or federal court may extend a disqualification for up to an additional eighteen months. Such disqualifications are mandatory and are in addition to any other penalty imposed by law.

(1.5) Any person against whom a county department of human or social services or the state department obtains a civil judgment in a state or federal court of record in this state based on allegations that the person obtained or willfully aided and abetted another to obtain food stamp coupons or authorization to purchase cards or an electronic benefits transfer card or similar credit card-type device through which food stamp benefits may be delivered the value of which is greater than that to which the person is justly entitled by means of a willfully false statement or representation, or by impersonation, or by any other fraudulent device with intent to defeat the purposes of the food stamp program, is disqualified from participation in the food stamp program for one year for a first incident, two years for a second incident, and permanently for a third or subsequent incident. Such disqualifications are mandatory and are in addition to any other remedy available to a judgment creditor.

If, at any time during the continuance of participation in the food stamp program, the recipient of food stamp coupons or authorization to purchase cards knowingly acquires any property or receives any increase in income or property, or both, in excess of that declared at the time of determination or redetermination of eligibility or if there is any other change in circumstances affecting the recipient's eligibility or the amount of food stamp coupons or authorization to purchase cards to which he or she is entitled, it is the duty of the recipient to notify the county department, or the state department in food stamp districts administered by the state department, of any such acquisition, receipt, or change in accordance with state department regulations; and any recipient of food stamp coupons or authorization to purchase cards who knowingly fails to do so, and who by such failure receives benefits in excess of those to which he or she was in fact entitled, commits a petty offense and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-503.

The county department, or the state department in food stamp districts administered by the state department, shall use an application form which contains appropriate and conspicuous notice of the penalties for fraud and shall deliver to each recipient with the first issuance of food stamp coupons or authorization to purchase cards and each redetermination thereafter a written notice explaining what changes in circumstances require notification to the county department or state department under subsection (2) of this section.

Additional costs incurred by district attorneys in enforcing this section, in accordance with the rules of the state department, shall be billed to county departments in the judicial district in the proportion to each county as specified in section 20-1-302, C.R.S., and the county departments shall pay such costs as an expense of food stamp administration.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire part added, p. 1087, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 89:

(1) amended, p. 846, § 119, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(1) amended and (1.5) added, p. 2064, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(1) and (1.5) amended, p. 1235, § 27, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(1)(a) and (2) amended, p. 1538, § 273, effective October 1.

L. 2018:

(1.5) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 447, § 120, effective August 8.

L. 2021:

(2) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3243, § 486, effective March 1, 2022.

Cross references:

(1) For other fraudulent acts relating to public assistance, see § 26-1-127.

(2) For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsections (1)(a) and (2), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002. For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

26-2-305.5. Categorical eligibility - repeal.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, "federal law" means the federal "Food and Nutrition Act of 2008", and any amendments to the act and any federal regulations adopted for the implementation of the act.

No later than October 1, 2010, the state department shall create a program or policy that, in compliance with federal law, establishes broad-based categorical eligibility for federal food assistance benefits pursuant to the supplemental nutrition assistance program.

At a minimum, the program or policy shall, to the extent authorized pursuant to federal law, eliminate the asset test for eligibility for federal food assistance benefits.

Notwithstanding any provisions of subsection (2) of this section to the contrary, the provisions of this section shall take effect only if the state department receives moneys pursuant to the federal 2010 department of defense appropriations bill that may be used to implement this section.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (HB 10-1022), ch. 414, p. 2043, § 2, effective June 10.

26-2-306. Trafficking in food stamps.

Any person who obtains, uses, transfers, or disposes of food stamps in the manner specified in paragraphs (a) to (c) of this subsection (1) commits the offense of trafficking in food stamps. A person who traffics in food stamps includes:

Any bona fide recipient of food stamps, or his authorized representative who knowingly transfers food stamps to another who does not, or does not intend to, use the said food stamps for the benefit of the food stamp household for whom the food stamps were intended as the same is defined in the rules and regulations of the state department;

Any person who knowingly acquires, accepts, uses, or transfers to another for consideration food stamps not issued to him or an authorized representative or to a member of a food stamp household of which he is a member by the state department or another authorized issuing agency in another state;

Any person who knowingly receives, possesses, alters, transfers, or redeems food stamps received, used, or transferred in violation of any federal statute.

Trafficking in food stamps is:

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2007, p. 1696, § 15, effective July 1, 2007.)

A petty offense if the amount is less than three hundred dollars;

A class 2 misdemeanor if the amount is three hundred dollars or more but less than one thousand dollars;

A class 1 misdemeanor if the amount is one thousand dollars or more but less than two thousand dollars;

A class 6 felony if the amount is two thousand dollars or more but less than five thousand dollars;

A class 5 felony if the amount is five thousand dollars or more but less than twenty thousand dollars;

A class 4 felony if the amount is twenty thousand dollars or more but less than one hundred thousand dollars;

A class 3 felony if the amount is one hundred thousand dollars or more but less than one million dollars; and

A class 2 felony if the amount is one million dollars or more.

When a person commits the offense of trafficking in food stamps twice or more within a period of six months, two or more of the offenses may be aggregated and charged in a single count, in which event the offenses so aggregated and charged shall constitute a single offense.

As used in this section, "food stamps" means coupons issued pursuant to the federal "Food Stamp Act", 7 U.S.C. 2011 to 2029, as amended.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire section added, p. 714, § 24, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 1737, § 31, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(2)(b) and (2)(c) amended, p. 1440, § 20, effective July 1; (2)(b), (2)(c), and (3) amended, p. 798, § 14, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(2) amended, p. 1539, § 274, effective October 1.

L. 2007:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 1696, § 15, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(3) amended, (HB 09-1334), ch. 244, p. 1100, § 5, effective May 11.

L. 2021:

(2)(b), (2)(b.5), (2)(c), and (2)(d) amended and (2)(b.7), (2)(e), (2)(f), and (2)(g) added, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3243, § 487, effective March 1, 2022.

L. 2022:

(3) amended, (HB 22-1229), ch. 68, p. 346, § 32, effective March 1.

26-2-307. Fuel assistance payments - eligibility for federal standard utility allowance - supplemental utility assistance fund established - definitions - repeal.

On and after July 1, 2024, the state department shall implement a program to make fuel assistance payments by crediting the fuel assistance payments to recipients' electronic benefits transfer service cards.

Except as provided in subsection (1)(d) of this section:

The state department shall make the fuel assistance payments to eligible households that receive SNAP benefits but that do not receive assistance under LEAP in order to qualify those households for the standard utility allowance to maximize their SNAP benefits;

To help the state department maximize the number of households that are receiving both the SNAP and LEAP benefits and facilitate the identification of those households that receive SNAP benefits and qualify for the fuel assistance payments, the state department shall develop a database connection between the LEAP eligibility system and the Colorado benefits management system;

Repealed.

(III.5) (A) For the 2022-23 state fiscal year, the general assembly shall appropriate two million dollars from the economic recovery and relief cash fund created in section 24-75-228 to the state department for the purposes of implementing this section.

(B) Money spent pursuant to this subsection (1)(b)(III.5) must conform with the allowable purposes set forth in the federal "American Rescue Plan Act of 2021", Pub.L. 117-2, as amended. The state department shall either spend or obligate such appropriation prior to December 30, 2024, and expend the appropriation on or before December 31, 2026.

(C) This subsection (1)(b)(III.5) is repealed, effective September 1, 2027.

Repealed.

On or before April 1, 2024, and on or before April 1 of each year thereafter, the state department shall submit a budget to the organization and the commission to include the state department's administrative costs to implement the program, including the cost to issue payments to recipients' electronic benefits transfer cards for payments made pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section, and the projected number of eligible households that the state department identifies as receiving SNAP benefits but that are not receiving assistance under LEAP, including an estimated number of new SNAP cases that the state department will approve during the upcoming federal fiscal year. Based on the budget that the state department submits, the organization shall:

Calculate the amount of money from the energy assistance system benefit charge collected pursuant to section 40-8.7-104 (2.5) that it allocates as part of its budget prepared pursuant to section 40-8.7-108 (3) for use by the state department to make fuel assistance payments and to implement the program;

Transmit the money to the state department on or before July 1, 2024, and on or before July 1 of each year thereafter.

Repealed.

If insufficient funds to develop the database connection are received by September 1, 2022, the state department need not commence work on developing the database connection pursuant to subsection (1)(b)(II) of this section, but shall:

Make the fuel assistance payments to all households that receive SNAP benefits;

Use any outside funds received to help cover its costs to process the EBT card payments; and

On or before April 1, 2022, and on or before April 1 of each year thereafter, submit a budget to the organization and the commission to include the state department's anticipated administrative costs to implement the program and the projected number of households that the state department identifies as receiving SNAP benefits, including an estimated number of new SNAP cases that the state department will approve during the upcoming federal fiscal year. Based on the budget that the state department submits, the organization shall calculate and, on or before July 1, 2022, transmit and, on or before July 1 of each year thereafter, transmit the amount of money from the energy assistance system benefit charge collected pursuant to section 40-8.7-104 (2.5) that it allocates as part of its budget prepared pursuant to section 40-8.7-108 (3) for use by the state department:

To make fuel assistance payments; and

Unless the state department received sufficient outside funds to cover all of its administrative costs for implementing the program, to cover its costs to process the EBT card payments and other administrative costs and to implement the program.

Subsection (1)(d) of this section and this subsection (1)(d.1) are repealed, effective September 1, 2022.

Repealed.

On or before October 1, 2022, the state department shall submit a budget to the organization and the commission to cover the state department's administrative costs to set up the program. Based on the budget that the state department submits, the organization shall:

Calculate the amount of money from the energy assistance system benefit charge collected pursuant to section 40-8.7-104 (2.5) that it allocates as part of its budget prepared pursuant to section 40-8.7-108 (3) for use by the state department to set up the program; and

Transmit the money to the state department on or before March 1, 2023.

The supplemental utility assistance fund, referred to in this subsection (2) as the "fund", is hereby created in the state treasury. The fund consists of money credited to the fund pursuant to section 40-8.7-108 (2)(b) and any other money that the general assembly may appropriate or transfer to the fund.

The state treasurer shall credit all interest and income derived from the deposit and investment of money in the fund to the fund.

Money in the fund is continuously appropriated to the state department for use in accordance with subsection (1) of this section.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Commission" means the legislative commission on low-income energy and water assistance created in section 40-8.5-103.5 (1).

"Electronic benefits transfer service" or "EBT" means the service that the state department implements pursuant to section 26-2-104 (2) to administer the delivery of public assistance payments and food stamps to recipients.

"Fuel assistance payment" means an annual payment that, when made to an eligible household identified pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, makes that household eligible to receive the standard utility allowance.

"LEAP" means the low-income energy assistance program specified in section 26-2-122.5.

"Organization" has the meaning set forth in section 40-8.7-103 (4).

"Outside funds" means:

Federal funds; or

Gifts, grants, or donations from public or private sources.

"Program" means the fuel assistance payment program implemented under subsection (1)(a) of this section.

"SNAP" means the supplemental nutrition assistance program established pursuant to this part 3.

"Standard utility allowance" means the heating and cooling standard utility allowance authorized in the federal supplemental nutrition assistance program regulations promulgated by the food and nutrition service in the United States department of agriculture.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (HB 21-1105), ch. 488, p. 3492, § 1, effective September 7.

L. 2022:

IP(1)(f) and (1)(f)(II) amended, (HB 22-1018), ch. 109, p. 497, § 1, effective April 21; (1)(a), IP(1)(b), IP(1)(b)(V), (1)(b)(V)(B), and IP(1)(d) amended, (1)(b)(III), (1)(b)(IV), (1)(c), and (1)(e) repealed, and (1)(b)(III.5) and (1)(d.1) added, (HB 22-1380), ch. 375, p. 2663, § 3, effective June 3.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1380, see section 1 of chapter 375, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

26-2-308. Colorado employment first - supplemental nutrition assistance program - federal match - legislative declaration - definition - repeal.

The general assembly finds that:

The COVID-19 pandemic that spread through Colorado beginning in February 2020 has led to extensive job loss throughout the state;

Persistent unemployment and loss of income as a result of the COVID-19 pandemic has led many Coloradans to rely on critical public assistance benefits, such as the supplemental nutrition assistance program, which helps struggling families pay for food;

In addition to providing essential emergency food assistance for Coloradans and their families, the supplemental nutrition assistance program also includes resources dedicated to employment, education, and training services, known as the Colorado employment first program; and

The Colorado employment first program promotes long-term self-sufficiency and independence by preparing supplemental nutrition assistance program participants for meaningful employment through work-related education and training activities.

Therefore, the general assembly declares that investing state dollars into the Colorado employment first program will enhance the program's ability to help supplemental nutrition assistance program participants achieve economic self-sufficiency by drawing down a fifty percent federal match for the supplemental nutrition assistance program, which is a flexible source of support for workforce development services.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, "Colorado employment first" means the employment and training program within the supplemental nutrition assistance program.

The state department shall direct county departments and any third-party partners to prioritize the money appropriated pursuant to subsection (4) of this section and the federal match to fund employment support and job retention services, as those services are described in section 8-83-404 (5)(b), and to support work-based learning opportunities for Colorado employment first participants.

Any remaining money may be used to initiate and enhance current and additional state- or county-initiated third-party partnerships, which must include allowing third-party partners to receive and use state money and any money received through the federal match in order to provide Colorado employment first services to participants.

The state department, county departments, or any third-party contractor that receives state or federal money pursuant to this section may use up to ten percent of the money for administrative costs incurred implementing this section.

For the 2020-21 state fiscal year, the general assembly shall appropriate three million dollars from the general fund to the state department for the purposes described in subsection (3) of this section. If any unexpended or unencumbered money appropriated for the fiscal year remains at the end of the fiscal year, the state department may expend the money for the same purposes without further appropriation.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2024.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (HB 21-1270), ch. 251, p. 1479, § 1, effective June 17.

L. 2022:

(4) and (5) amended, (HB 22-1380), ch. 375, p. 2664, § 4, effective June 3.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1380, see section 1 of chapter 375, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.